Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 45
CONVERSION

Section

11-45-101. Conversion into federal association.

Any savings and loan association or other home-financing organization, by whatever name or style it may be designated, which is eligible to become a federal savings and loan association may convert itself into a federal savings and loan association by the following procedure:

At any regular or special meeting of the shareholders of any such association called to consider such action and held in accordance with the laws governing such association, such shareholders, by an affirmative vote of the shareholders owning and voting the number of shares required for authorization of the sale of the association's assets or required to accomplish a consolidation or a merger, whichever is the greater, present in person or by proxy, may declare by resolution the determination to convert said association into a federal savings and loan association.

A copy of the minutes of such meeting of the shareholders, verified by the affidavit of the president or vice-president and the secretary of the meeting, shall be filed within ten days after said meeting in the office or division of this state having supervision of such association. Such verified copy of the minutes of such meeting when so filed shall be presumptive evidence of the holding and of the action of such meeting.

Within a reasonable time and without any unnecessary delay after the adjournment of such meeting of shareholders, the association shall take such action as may be necessary to make it a federal savings and loan association, and, within ten days after receipt of the federal charter, there shall be filed in the office or division of this state having supervision of such association a copy of said charter issued to such association by the office of thrift supervision or its successor or a certificate showing the organization of such association as a federal savings and loan association certified by, or on behalf of, the office of thrift supervision or its successor. Upon the filing of such instrument, such association shall cease to be a state association and shall thereafter be a federal savings and loan association.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 263, § 1.

CSA:

C. 25, § 67.

CRS 53:

§ 122-7-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-6-1.

L. 2004:

(1)(c) amended, p. 140, § 26, effective July 1.

11-45-102. Effect of conversion.

At the time when such conversion becomes effective, such association shall cease to be supervised by this state, and all of the property of such association, including all of its right, title, and interest in and to all property of every kind and character, whether real, personal, or mixed, immediately by operation of law and without any conveyance or transfer whatsoever and without any further act or deed, shall continue to be vested in said association under its new name and style as a federal savings and loan association and under its new jurisdiction; and said federal savings and loan association shall have, hold, and enjoy the same in its own right as fully and to the same extent as if the same were possessed, held, and enjoyed by it as a state association, and said federal savings and loan association, at the time of the taking effect of such conversion, shall continue to be responsible for all of the obligations of said state association to the same extent as though said conversion had not taken place. It is expressly declared that such federal savings and loan association shall be merely a continuation of the state association under a new name, a new jurisdiction, and such revision of its corporate structure as may be considered necessary for its proper operation under said new jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 265, § 2.

CSA:

C. 25, § 68.

CRS 53:

§ 122-7-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-6-2.

11-45-103. Conversion into state association.

Any federal savings and loan association may convert itself into an association under articles 40 to 46 of this title by the majority vote of all members present in person or by proxy at an annual meeting or at any special meeting called to consider such action. Copies of the minutes of the proceedings of such meeting of members, verified by the affidavit of the secretary or an assistant secretary, shall be filed in the office of the commissioner and mailed to the office of thrift supervision, or its successor, within ten days after such meeting. Such verified copies of the proceedings of the meeting when so filed shall be prima facie evidence of the holding and action of such meeting.

At the meeting at which conversion is voted upon, the members shall also vote upon the directors who shall be the directors of the state-chartered association after conversion takes effect. Such directors shall then execute two copies of the certificate of incorporation and four copies of the bylaws. The directors chosen for the association shall all sign and acknowledge the certificate of incorporation as subscribers thereto and the bylaws as incorporators of the association. The commissioner may provide, by regulation, for the procedure to be followed by any such federal savings and loan association converting into an association under articles 40 to 46 of this title. The state-chartered association shall be a continuation of the corporate entity of the converting federal association and continue to have all of its property and rights.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 251, § 24.

CSA:

C. 25, § 68(1).

CRS 53:

§ 122-7-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-6-3.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 140, § 27, effective July 1.